District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.112

Repealed

Foreign corporations — Annual report; contents.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 224, ch. 269, § 112
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 242, Pub. L. 86-106, § 16
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-39, § 2(b), 42 DCR 3273
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-185, § 2(b), 43 DCR 4510
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.112.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.13.
1973 Ed., § 29-933m.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-150, July 20, 1996, law notification 44 DCR 2863).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Report Suspension Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-247, April 11, 1996, 43 DCR 2125), and § 2(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-307, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4208).
For temporary suspension of all references in section to 5-year reporting, filing, or payment of fees requirements until after December 31, 1996, at which time the 1-year or annual requirements shall be in effect and the annual report fee shall be $100, see § 2(c) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Report Suspension Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-247, April 11, 1996, 43 DCR 2125).
For temporary suspension of the 5-year reporting provision, see § 2(c) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-307, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4208).
Preparation and payment of appropriate taxes: Section 2(i) of D.C. Law 11-185 provides that nothing in the act shall be construed or interpreted as repealing or affecting any requirement of a domestic or foreign corporation to prepare and submit annual tax forms, or to pay any appropriate District or federal taxes, as provided in accordance with the laws of the District of Columbia or the United States.